Arkansas, session 2025, HB1273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-18-701(a)(3)(B), concerning the lien
created by the entry of a certificate of indebtedness issued by the Secretary
of the Department of Finance and Administration, is amended to read as
follows:
(B) This lien is:
*JLL069*
01/27/2025 3:38:02 PM JLL069

HB1273
(i) In addition to any other lien existing in favor
of the state to secure payment of taxes, applicable interest, penalties, and
costs, including any costs the circuit clerk is entitled to receive as
provided by law for either the filing or the release of this lien; and
(ii) Superior to:
(a) Other liens of any type or character,
other than a purchase money mortgage, attaching to the property after the
date of entry of the certificate of indebtedness on the judgment docket; and
(b) All claims of unsecured creditors.



























01/27/2025 3:38:02 PM JLL069